Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 469.320 is amended to read:
469.320. (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (5) of  this section, no facility shall be
constructed or expanded unless a site certificate has been issued for the site thereof in  the manner
provided in ORS 469.300 to 469.563, 469.590 to 469.619, 469.930 and 469.992. No  facility shall be
constructed or operated except in  conformity with the requirements of ORS 469.300 to 469.563,
469.590 to 469.619, 469.930 and 469.992.
(2) A site certificate is not required for:
(a) An energy facility for which no site certificate has been issued that, on August 2,  1993, had
operable electric generating equipment for a modification that uses  the same fuel type and increases
electric generating capacity, if:
(A) The site is not enlarged; and
(B) The ability of the energy  facility to use fuel for electricity production under peak steady
state operating conditions is not more than 200 million Btu  per hour greater than it was on August
2, 1993, or the energy facility expansion is called for in the short-term plan of  action of an energy
resource plan that has been acknowledged by the Public Utility Commission of Oregon.
(b) Construction or  expansion of any interstate natural gas pipeline or associated underground
natural gas storage facility  authorized by and subject to the continuing regulation of the Federal
Energy Regulatory Commission or successor agency.
(c) An energy facility, except coal and nuclear power plants, if the energy facility:
(A) Sequentially produces electrical energy and useful thermal energy from the same fuel source;
and
(B) Under average annual operating conditions, has a nominal electric generating capacity:
(i) Of less than 50 megawatts and the fuel chargeable  to power heat rate value is not greater
than 6,000 Btu per kilowatt hour;
(ii) Of 50 megawatts or more and the fuel chargeable to power heat rate value  is not greater
than 5,500 Btu per kilowatt hour; or
(iii) Specified by the Energy Facility Siting Council by rule based  on the council’s determination
relating to emissions of the energy facility.
(d) Temporary storage, at the site of a nuclear-fueled thermal power plant for which a  site cer-
tificate has been issued by the State of Oregon, of radioactive waste from the plant.
Enrolled House Bill 4031 (HB 4031-A) Page 1
(e) An energy facility  as defined in ORS 469.300 (12)(a)(G), if the plant also produces a secondary
fuel used on site for the production of  heat or electricity, if the output of the primary fuel is less
than six billion Btu of heat a day.
(f) An energy facility as defined in ORS 469.300 (12)(a)(G), if the facility:
(A) Exclusively uses biomass, including but not limited to grain,  whey, potatoes, oilseeds, waste
vegetable oil or cellulosic biomass, as the source of material for conversion to a liquid fuel;
(B) Has received local land use approval  under the applicable acknowledged comprehensive plan
and land use regulations of the affected local government and the facility complies  with any state-
wide planning goals or rules of the  Land Conservation and Development Commission that are di-
rectly applicable to the facility;
(C) Requires no new  electric transmission lines or gas or petroleum product pipelines that would
require a site certificate under subsection (1) of this section;
(D) Produces synthetic fuel, at  least 90 percent of which is used in an industrial or refueling
facility located within one mile  of the facility or is transported from the facility by rail or barge;
and
(E) Emits less than 118 pounds of carbon dioxide per million Btu from fossil fuel used for  con-
version energy.
(g) A standby generation facility, if the facility complies with all of the following:
(A) The facility has received local land use approval under the applicable acknowledged  com-
prehensive plan and  land use regulations of the affected local government and the facility complies
with all statewide planning goals  and applicable rules of the Land Conservation and Development
Commission;
(B) The standby generators have been approved by the  Department of Environmental Quality
as having complied with  all applicable air and water quality requirements. For an applicant that
proposes to provide the physical facilities for the  installation of standby generators, the requirement
of this subparagraph may be met  by agreeing to require such a term in the lease contract for the
facility;  and
(C) The standby generators are:
(i) Electrically  incapable of being interconnected to the transmission grid. For an applicant that
proposes to provide the physical facilities for the installation of standby  generators under this sub-
subparagraph, the requirement of this sub-subparagraph may be met by agreeing to require such a
term in the lease contract for the facility; or
(ii) Electrically capable of being interconnected to the grid but are dispatched  to the grid by a
local transmission and  distribution grid operator or balancing authority to support grid reliability,
are operated consistent with 40 C.F.R. 63.6640(f), as in effect on March 27, 2024, and are exclusively
using renewable fuels, including renewable diesel, renewable  natural gas or renewable hydrogen, if
such fuels are available and if their use does not  violate the warranty or certification of the gen-
erator.
(h) An energy facility if:
(A) The facility produces power exclusively from one or more of the following:
(i) Solar photovoltaic or thermal energy;
(ii) Wind energy;
(iii) Geothermal energy; or
(iv) Marine energy;
(B) The developer of the facility:
(i) Submits, on or before December 31, 2028, a land use application to construct  or oper-
ate the facility to, and receives approval  from, the local government within whose jurisdic-
tion the facility is proposed to be located; and
(ii) Provides a written or  electronic notification to the local government, and a copy of
the notification to the Energy Facility Siting Council, that:
(I) Confirms that construction of the facility has begun such  that the facility qualifies
for a tax credit authorized under section 45, 45Y, 48 or 48E of the Internal Revenue Code;
Enrolled House Bill 4031 (HB 4031-A) Page 2
(II) Identifies the applicant and facility;
(III) Identifies the applicable federal tax credits; and
(IV) Includes a brief description of actions taken to begin construction, within the
meaning of the applicable notices, regulations or rulings of the  United States Department
of the Treasury or Internal Revenue Service; and
(C) The facility is placed in service:
(i) On or before December 31, 2030; or
(ii) If the facility is placed in service after December 31, 2030, on or before a date  allowed
by exception by the United States Department of the Treasury or Internal  Revenue Service
by which date the facility still qualifies  for a tax credit under section 45, 45Y, 48 or 48E of
the Internal Revenue Code.
(3) The Energy Facility  Siting Council may review and, if necessary, revise the fuel chargeable
to power heat rate value set forth  in subsection (2)(c)(B) of this section. In making its determination,
the council shall ensure that the fuel chargeable to power heat rate value for facilities set forth  in
subsection (2)(c)(B) of this section remains significantly lower  than the fuel chargeable to power
heat rate value for  the best available, commercially viable thermal power plant technology at the
time of the revision.
(4)(a)(A) Any person who proposes to construct or enlarge an  energy facility and who claims
an exemption under subsection (2)(a), (c) or (f) of this section from the requirement to obtain a  site
certificate shall request the Energy Facility Siting Council to determine whether the proposed fa-
cility qualifies for the claimed exemption.
(B) The council may not require a person who operates or  proposes to construct or enlarge an
energy facility to request that the council determine whether  the proposed facility qualifies for ex-
emption under subsection (2)(g) of this section.
(b) The council shall make its determination within 60 days after  the request for exemption is
filed. An appeal from the council’s determination on a request for exemption shall be  made under
ORS 469.403, except that the  scope of review by the Supreme Court shall be the same as a review
by a circuit court under ORS 183.484. The record  on review by the Supreme Court shall be the re-
cord established in the council proceeding on the exemption.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of  this section, a separate site certificate shall not be re-
quired for:
(a) Transmission lines, battery energy storage systems, storage facilities, pipelines  or similar
related or supporting facilities, if such related or  supporting facilities are addressed in and are
subject to a site certificate for another energy facility;
(b) Expansion within the site or within the energy generation area  of a facility for which a site
certificate has been issued, if the existing site certificate has  been amended to authorize expansion;
or
(c) Expansion, either within the site or  outside the site, of an existing council certified surface
facility related to an underground gas storage reservoir, if the  existing site certificate is amended
to authorize expansion.
(6) If the substantial loss of the steam host  causes a facility exempt under subsection (2)(c) of
this section to substantially fail to meet  the exemption requirements under subsection (2)(c) of this
section, the electric generating  facility shall cease to operate one year after the substantial loss of
the steam host unless an application for a site certificate has  been filed in accordance with the
provisions of ORS 469.300 to 469.563.
(7) As used in this section:
(a) “Standby generation facility” means an electric power generating facility, including standby
generators and the physical structures necessary to  install and connect standby generators, that
provides temporary electric power:
(A) In the event of a power outage  and that is electrically incapable of being interconnected
with the transmission grid; or
(B) Consistent with 40 C.F.R. 63.6640(f), as in effect on March 27, 2024.
Enrolled House Bill 4031 (HB 4031-A) Page 3
(b) “Total energy output” means the sum of useful thermal energy output and useful electrical
energy output.
(c) “Useful thermal energy” means the verifiable thermal energy used in any  viable industrial
or commercial process, heating or cooling application.
(8)(a) If the developer of a facility elects, or the governing body  of the local government after
consulting  with  the developer elects, to defer regulatory authority to the Energy Facility Siting
Council, the developer of a facility shall obtain a site certificate, in the manner  provided in ORS
469.300 to 469.563, 469.590 to  469.619, 469.930 and 469.992, for a facility that, notwithstanding the
definition of “energy facility” in ORS 469.300, is:
(A) An electric power generating plant with  an average electric generating capacity of less than
100 megawatts produced from wind energy at a single energy facility or within  a single energy
generation area;
(B) An associated transmission line;
(C) A battery energy storage system; or
(D) A  solar photovoltaic power generation facility that is not an energy facility as defined in
ORS 469.300 (12)(a)(D).
(b) An election by a developer or a local government under this subsection is final.
(c) An election by a local government under this  subsection is not a land use decision as defined
in ORS 197.015.
(d) A local government may not  make an election under this subsection after a permit applica-
tion has been submitted under ORS 215.416 or 227.175.
SECTION 2.
This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House February 12, 2026
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate February 25, 2026
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4031 (HB 4031-A) Page 4